Oklahoma, session 2026, SB369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 650, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 650. A. Every person who, without justifiable or
excusable cause, knowingly commits any aggravated assault and
battery upon the person of a police officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff
or, highway patrolman, corrections personnel as defined in Section
649 of this title, or any state peace officer employed by any state
or federal governmental agency to enforce state laws, while the
officer is in the performance of his or her duties shall, upon
conviction thereof, be guilty of a felony, which shall be punishable
by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for
not more than life or by, a fine not exceeding One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
B. Every person who, without justifiable or excusable cause,
commits any aggravated assault and battery upon a person that the
violator knows or should reasonably know is a police officer,
sheriff, deputy sheriff or, highway patrolman, corrections personnel
as defined in Section 649 of this title, or any state peace officer

employed by any state or federal governmental agency to enforce
state laws, that results in maiming as defined in Section 751 of
this title, while the officer is in the performance of his or her
duties shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections of for
not less than five (5) years nor more than life or by, a fine not
exceeding Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine
and imprisonment.
C. For purposes of this section, aggravated assault and battery
upon law officers, includes the:
1. The physical contact with and in an attempt to gain control
of the firearm; or
2. The strangulation,
of any police officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, highway patrolman,
corrections personnel as defined in Section 649 of this title, or
any peace officer employed by any state or federal governmental
agency to enforce state laws.
As used in this subsection, “strangulation” shall have the same
meaning as provided in subsection J of Section 644 of this title.
D. This section shall not supersede any other act or acts, but
shall be cumulative thereto.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 369 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 369 Page 3